test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-2-nitonawîw_gt-norm.yaml
      # 12Pl
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO: nitonawâtân # let you and us seek him/her now, let you and us look for him/her now, let you and us search for him/her now
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO: nitonawâtânik # let you and us seek them now, let you and us look for them now, let you and us search for them now

      # 2Pl
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO: nitonawik # (you all) seek me now, (you all) look for me now, (you all) search for me now
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1PlO: nitonawinân # (you all) seek us now, (you all) look for us now, (you all) search for us now
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: nitonawihk # (you all) seek him/her now, (you all) look for him/her now, (you all) search for him/her now
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO: nitonawihkwâw # (you all) seek them now, (you all) look for them now, (you all) search for them now
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO+Var/East: nitonawik # (you all) seek them now, (you all) look for them now, (you all) search for them now
      

      # Imp # Del

      # 2Sg
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO: nitonawîhkan # (you) seek me later, (you) look for me later, (you) search for me later
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO: nitonawîhkâhk # (you) seek us later, (you) look for us later, (you) search for us later
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: nitonawâhkan # (you) seek him/her later, (you) look for him/her later, (you) search for him/her later
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO: nitonawâhkanik # (you) seek them later, (you) look for them later, (you) search for them later

      # 12Pl
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: nitonawâhkahk # let you and us seek him/her later, let you and us look for him/her later, let you and us search for him/her later
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO: nitonawâhkahkik # let you and us seek them later, let you and us look for them later, let you and us search for them later
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East: nitonawâhkanik # let you and us seek them later, let you and us look for them later, let you and us search for them later

      # 2Pl
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO: nitonawîhkîk # (you all) seek me later, (you all) look for me later, (you all) search for me later
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1PlO: nitonawîhkâhk # (you all) seek us later, (you all) look for us later, (you all) search for us later
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: nitonawâhkîk # (you all) seek him/her later, (you all) look for him/her later, (you all) search for him/her later
      nitonawîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO: nitonawâhkîkwâw # (you all) seek them later, (you all) look for them later, (you all) search for them later
      
